Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.040

Certified feed lot license—Required—Application, contents.

Any person desiring to engage in the business of operating one or more certified feed lots shall obtain an annual license from the director for that purpose. The application for a license shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall include the following:

(1) The number of certified feed lots the applicant intends to operate and their exact location and mailing address;

(2) The legal description of the land on which the certified feed lot will be situated;

(3) A complete description of the facilities used for feeding and handling of cattle at each certified feed lot;

(4) The estimated number of cattle which can be handled for feeding purposes at each certified feed lot; and

(5) Any other information necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 2003 c 326 s 48; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.